Utah statutes.
17B-2a-206.   Drainage district board of trustees.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), each member of the board of trustees of a
drainage district shall be appointed by the legislative body of the county in
which the district is located.
(2)  If a drainage district is located in more than one county, a county
legislative body may not appoint more than two members.
